Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB585.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 336.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Employees may, free from restraint or coercion by the employers or their agents,
associate collectively for self-organization and designate collectively
representatives of their own choosing to negotiate the terms and conditions of their
employment to effectively promote their own rights and general welfare.
Employees, collectively and individually, may strike, engage in peaceful picketing,
and assemble collectively for peaceful purposes, except that no public employee,
collectively or individually, may engage in a strike or a work stoppage. Nothing in
this statute and KRS 65.015, 67A.6904, 67C.406, 70.262, 78.470, 78.480, 336.132,
336.134, 336.180, 336.990, and 345.050 shall be construed as altering, amending,
granting, or removing the rights of public employees to associate collectively for
self-organization and designate collectively representatives of their own choosing to
negotiate the terms and conditions of their employment to effectively promote their
own rights and general welfare.
(2) Neither employers or their agents nor employees or associations, organizations or
groups of employees shall engage or be permitted to engage in unfair or illegal acts
or practices or resort to violence, intimidation, threats or coercion.
(3) [(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section or any provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, no employee shall be required, as a
condition of employment or continuation of employment, to:
1. Become or remain a member of a labor organization;
2. Pay any dues, fees, assessments, or other similar charges of any kind or
amount to a labor organization; or
3. Pay to any charity or other third party, in lieu of these payments, any
amount equivalent to or pro rata portion of dues, fees, assessments, or
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
other charges required of a labor organization.
(b) As used in this subsection, the term "employee" means any person employed
by or suffered or permitted to work for a public or private employer.
(4) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her representative shall
investigate complaints of violations or threatened violations of subsection (3) of this
section and may initiate enforcement of a criminal penalty by causing a complaint
to be filed with the appropriate local prosecutor and ensure effective enforcement.
(5) ]Except in instances where violence, personal injury, or damage to property have
occurred and such occurrence is supported by an affidavit setting forth the facts and
circumstances surrounding such incidents, the employees and their agents shall not
be restrained or enjoined from exercising the rights granted to them in subsection
(1) of this section without a hearing first being held, unless the employees or their
agents are engaged in a strike in violation of a "no strike" clause in their labor
contract.
(4)[(6)] Submission of a false affidavit concerning violence, personal injury, or
damage to property shall constitute a violation of KRS 523.030. In the absence of
any such affidavit alleging violence, personal injury, or damage injunctions shall be
issued only by a Circuit Judge or other justice or judge acting as a Circuit Judge
pursuant to law.
Section 2. KRS 336.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon proof that any person employed by the Education and Labor Cabinet as a
labor inspector has taken any part in any strike, lockout or similar labor dispute, the
person shall forfeit his or her office.
(2) The following civil penalties shall be imposed, in accordance with the provisions in
KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this chapter:
(a) Any person who violates KRS 336.110 or 336.130 shall for each offense be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(b) Any corporation, association, organization, or person that violates KRS
336.190 and 336.200 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
offense. Each act of violation, and each day during which such an agreement
remains in effect, shall constitute a separate offense;
(c) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 336.220 shall be assessed a
civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation; and
(d) Any labor organization who violates KRS 336.135 shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(e) Any public employer or labor organization that violates KRS 161.158,
164.365, 336.133, [336.134, ]336.1341, 336.135, or 336.180 shall be assessed
a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense[.
(3) Any labor organization, employer, or other person who directly or indirectly
violates KRS 336.130(3) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Any person aggrieved as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) may seek abatement of the violation or threatened violation by
petitioning a court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief and shall be
entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she prevails in the action.
(5) Any person injured as a result of any violation or threatened violation of KRS
336.130(3) may recover all damages resulting from the violation or threatened
violation and shall be entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees if he or she
prevails in the action].
Section 3. KRS 67A.6904 is amended to read as follows:
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]Urban-county governments and their
representatives and agents are prohibited from:
(a) Interfering, restraining, or coercing police officers, firefighter personnel,
firefighters, or corrections personnel in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in
KRS 67A.6902;
(b) Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence, or administration of
any labor organization;
(c) Discriminating in regard to hiring or tenure of employment or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in any labor
organization;
(d) Discharging or otherwise discriminating against an employee because he or
she has signed or filed any affidavit, petition, or complaint or given any
information or testimony under this section; or
(e) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a labor organization which
is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including
but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive
representative.
(2) Labor organizations and their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Restraining or coercing:
1. Police officers, firefighter personnel, firefighters, or corrections
personnel in the exercise of the right guaranteed in KRS 67A.6902; and
2. An urban-county government in the selection of a representative for the
purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances; or
(b) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with an urban-county
government, if they have been designated in accordance with the provisions of
this section as the exclusive representative of police officers, firefighter
personnel, firefighters, or corrections personnel in an appropriate unit.
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
(3) For the purposes of this section, to bargain collectively is to carry out in good faith
the mutual obligation of the parties, or their representatives; to meet together at
reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making process; to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment; to negotiate an agreement; to negotiate any question arising under any
agreement; and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached,
if requested by either party. The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either
party to agree to a proposal, or require either party to make a concession.
Section 4. KRS 67C.406 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130(3), ]Consolidated local governments, their
representatives, or their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Interfering, restraining, or coercing police officers in the exercise of the rights
guaranteed in KRS 67C.402;
(b) Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence, or administration of
any labor organization;
(c) Discriminating in regard to hiring or tenure of employment or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in any labor
organization;
(d) Discharging or otherwise discriminating against an employee because he or
she has signed or filed any affidavit, petition, or complaint or given any
information or testimony under this section; or
(e) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a labor organization which
is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including
but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive
representative.
(2) Labor organizations or their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Restraining or coercing:
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
1. Police officers in the exercise of the right guaranteed in KRS 67C.402;
and
2. A consolidated local government in the selection of a representative for
the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances; or
(b) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a consolidated local
government, if they have been designated in accordance with the provisions of
this section as the exclusive representative of police officers in an appropriate
unit.
(3) For the purposes of this section, to bargain collectively is to carry out in good faith
the mutual obligation of the parties, or their representatives; to meet together at
reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making process; to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment; to negotiate an agreement; to negotiate any question arising under any
agreement; and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached,
if requested by either party. The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either
party to agree to a proposal, or require either party to make a concession.
Section 5. KRS 70.262 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county containing a consolidated local
government or city of the first class that has adopted a merit system under KRS
70.260 to 70.273, deputies subject to the merit system may organize, form, join, or
participate in organizations in order to engage in lawful concerted activities for the
purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid and protection, and to bargain
collectively through a representative of their own free choice. Deputies shall also
have the right to refrain from any or all of these activities but shall be subject to the
lawful provisions of any collective bargaining agreement entered into under this
section. Strikes by deputies of any collective bargaining unit shall be prohibited at
any time.
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
(2) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county containing a consolidated local
government or city of the first class that has adopted a merit system under KRS
70.260 to 70.273, the sheriff shall contract with a representative of the deputies
described in subsection (1) of this section employed by the sheriff where the
representative has established representation of a majority of the deputies, with
respect to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment, including
execution of a written contract incorporating any agreement reached between the
sheriff and the representative. The sheriff shall not be required to bargain over
matters of inherent managerial policy.
Section 6. KRS 78.470 is amended to read as follows:
[Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county in the Commonwealth of Kentucky,
which has a population of 300,000 or more and which has adopted the merit system, the
county employees in the classified service as police may organize, form, join or
participate in organizations in order to engage in lawful concerted activities for the
purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid and protection, and to bargain
collectively through representatives of their own free choice. Such employees shall also
have the right to refrain from any or all such activities. Strikes by said members of any
such collective bargaining unit shall be prohibited at any time.
Section 7. KRS 78.480 is amended to read as follows:
[Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]In any county in the Commonwealth of Kentucky
which has a population of 300,000 or more and which has adopted the merit system for
its police force, the fiscal court may contract with representatives of the police employed
by said county with respect to wages, hours, terms and conditions of employment,
including execution of a written contract incorporating any agreement reached between
the fiscal court and representatives of the police. The fiscal court shall not be required to
bargain over matters of inherent managerial policy.
Section 8. KRS 345.050 is amended to read as follows:
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
(1) [Except as provided in KRS 336.130, ]Public employers, their representatives or
their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Interfering, restraining or coercing firefighters in the exercise of the rights
guaranteed in KRS 345.030;
(b) Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence or administration of
any labor organization;
(c) Discriminating in regard to hiring or tenure of employment or any term or
condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in any labor
organization;
(d) Discharging or otherwise discriminating against an employee because he or
she has signed or filed any affidavit, petition or complaint or given any
information or testimony under this chapter; or
(e) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a labor organization which
is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including
but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive
representative.
(2) Labor organizations or their agents are prohibited from:
(a) Restraining or coercing:
1. Firefighters in the exercise of the right guaranteed in subsection (1) of
KRS 345.030, and
2. A public employer in the selection of his or her representative for the
purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances; or
(b) Refusing to bargain collectively in good faith with a public employer, if they
have been designated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter as the
exclusive representative of firefighters in an appropriate unit.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, to bargain collectively is to carry out in good faith
the mutual obligation of the parties, or their representatives; to meet together at
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making process; to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours and other conditions of
employment; to negotiate an agreement; to negotiate any question arising under any
agreement; and to execute a written contract incorporating any agreement reached,
if requested by either party. The obligation shall not be interpreted to compel either
party to agree to a proposal, or require either party to make a concession.
Section 9. KRS 336.1341 is amended to read as follows:
KRS 336.133[, 336.134,] and 336.180 shall not apply to any deductions from a public
employee's wages, compensation, or earnings made by the public employer in accordance
with any joint wage agreement or collective bargaining contract entered into, opted into,
modified, renewed, or extended prior to March 29, 2023. However, any joint wage
agreement or collective bargaining contract entered into, opted into, modified, renewed,
or extended after March 29, 2023, as well as any deductions made to a public employee's
wages, compensation, or earnings made in accordance with those joint wage agreements
or collective bargaining contracts or otherwise made after March 29, 2023, shall comply
with KRS 336.133[ and 336.134].
Section 10. KRS 336.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "employee" means any person employed by or suffered or
permitted to work for a public or private employer, except "employee" shall not
mean any person covered by the Federal Railway Labor Act and the National Labor
Relations Act.
(2) An employee shall not be enrolled as a member of a labor organization unless the
employee has affirmatively requested membership in writing.
(3) A sum shall not be withheld from the earnings of any employee for the purpose of
paying union dues or other fees paid by members of a labor organization or
employees who are non-members except upon the written or electronic
authorization of the employee member or employee non-member[, unless the
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
employer is a public employer, in which case KRS 336.134 applies to that
employer].
(4) The requirements in this section shall not be waived by any member or non-
member of a labor organization, nor required to be waived as a condition of
obtaining or maintaining employment.
(5) Signing or refraining from signing the authorization set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section shall not be made a condition of obtaining or maintaining
employment.
(6) (a) A labor organization shall maintain financial records substantially similar to
and no less comprehensive than the records required to be maintained under
29 U.S.C. sec. 431(b).
(b) These records shall be kept in a searchable electronic format and provided to
every employee it represents.
(c) The records and the data or summary by which the records can be verified,
explained, or clarified shall be kept for a period of not less than five (5) years.
(d) A labor organization composed of public employees shall transmit financial
records detailing the labor organization's quarterly expenses to its members on
an annual basis.
(7) This section shall not apply to any agreement between employers and employees or
labor organizations entered into before January 9, 2017, but any such agreement
entered into, opted in, renewed, or extended on or after January 9, 2017, and which
violates this section shall be unlawful and void.
(8) This section shall be known as the "Paycheck Protection Act."
Section 11. The following KRS sections are repealed:
65.016 Prohibition against requiring any employer to pay employee a certain wage or
fringe benefit.
336.132 Labor agreement in violation of KRS 336.130 is unlawful and void --
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2081
Exceptions.
336.134 Public employer prohibited from deducting from wages of any public employee
for charges to a labor organization or for political activities.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 2/6/2026 8:58 AM Jacketed